Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-109
Extended area service, defined.

Extended area service means a telecommunications service which groups two or more exchanges to allow subscribers of one exchange in the group to place and receive two-way switched communications to and from subscribers in one or more other exchanges in the group without an interexchange toll charge.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 10.